Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. Interexchange Companies

§ 37-15-301.
Regulation of interexchange companies.

An interexchange company not authorized to provide intrastate telecommunications service in this state on or before January 1, 1995, shall not provide intrastate interexchange telecommunications services unless it first registers with the commission. An interexchange company authorized by the commission to provide intrastate telecommunications service as of January 1, 1995, is not required to register. The form for registration shall be specified by the commission.

Any interexchange company registered with the commission to provide intrastate telecommunications services shall be authorized to provide statewide services.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-301; 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (c) through (e), which read:

“(c)

Each interexchange company shall maintain on file with the commission a price schedule for each service which shall contain all of the prices, terms and conditions pursuant to which that service is offered. A new or amended price schedule shall be effective when filed or upon the date indicated therein by the company. An interexchange company shall charge prices in accordance with its price schedule unless a separate contract is negotiated.

“(d)

An interexchange company may by contract provide interexchange telecommunications services at prices and under terms and conditions that are specific to a particular customer or group of customers.

“(e)

Interexchange companies shall be subject to quality of service regulation as provided in W.S.

37-15-406

.”